Utah statutes.
20A-2-104.   Voter registration form -- Registered voter lists -- Fees for copies.

(1)  Every person applying to be registered shall complete a registration form printed in substantially the following form:

-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

UTAH ELECTION REGISTRATION FORM

Are you a citizen of the United States of America?                             Yes             No

Will you be 18 years old on or before election day?                            Yes             No

If you checked "no" to either of the above two questions, do not complete this form.

Name of Voter _________________________________________________________________

First 			Middle  		    Last

Utah Driver License or Utah Identification Card  Number____________________________



Date of Birth ______________________________________________________

Street Address of Principal Place of Residence

____________________________________________________________________________

City  		          County  		          State  		      Zip Code

Telephone Number (optional) _________________________

Last four digits of Social Security Number ______________________

Last former address at which I was registered to vote (if known)__________________________

____________________________________________________________________________

City			County			State		       Zip Code

Political Party

(a listing of each registered political party, as defined in Section 20A-8-101 and maintained by the lieutenant governor under Section 67-1a-2, with each party's name preceded by a checkbox)

  ☐Unaffiliated (no political party preference)    ☐Other (Please specify)___________________

I do swear (or affirm), subject to penalty of law for false statements, that the information contained in this form is true, and that I am a citizen of the United States and a resident of the state of Utah, residing at the above address.  I will be at least 18 years old and will have resided in Utah for 30 days immediately before the next election.  I am not a convicted felon currently incarcerated for commission of a felony.

Signed and sworn

__________________________________________________________

Voter's Signature

_______________(month/day/year).

CITIZENSHIP AFFIDAVIT

Name:

Name at birth, if different:

Place of birth:

Date of birth:

Date and place of naturalization (if applicable):

I hereby swear and affirm, under penalties for voting fraud set forth below, that I am a citizen and that to the best of my knowledge and belief the information above is true and correct.

____________________________

Signature of Applicant

In accordance with Section 20A-2-401, the penalty for willfully causing, procuring, or allowing yourself to be registered to vote if you know you are not entitled to register to vote is up to one year in jail and a fine of up to $2,500.

NOTICE:  IN ORDER TO BE ALLOWED TO VOTE, YOU MUST PRESENT VALID VOTER IDENTIFICATION TO THE POLL WORKER BEFORE VOTING, WHICH MUST BE A VALID FORM OF PHOTO IDENTIFICATION THAT SHOWS YOUR NAME AND PHOTOGRAPH; OR

TWO DIFFERENT FORMS OF IDENTIFICATION THAT SHOW YOUR NAME AND CURRENT ADDRESS.

FOR OFFICIAL USE ONLY

Type of I.D. ____________________________

Voting Precinct _________________________

Voting I.D. Number _____________________

------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

(2) (a)  Except as provided under Subsection (2)(b), the county clerk shall retain a copy of each voter registration form in a permanent countywide alphabetical file, which may be electronic or some other recognized system.

(b)  The county clerk may transfer a superceded voter registration form to the Division of Archives and Records Service created under Section 63A-12-101.

(3) (a)  Each county clerk shall retain lists of currently registered voters.

(b)  The lieutenant governor shall maintain a list of registered voters in electronic form.

(c)  If there are any discrepancies between the two lists, the county clerk's list is the official list.

(d)  The lieutenant governor and the county clerks may charge the fees established under the authority of Subsection 63G-2-203(10) to individuals who wish to obtain a copy of the list of registered voters.

(4)  When political parties not listed on the voter registration form qualify as registered political parties under Title 20A, Chapter 8, Political Party Formation and Procedures, the lieutenant governor shall inform the county clerks about the name of the new political party and direct the county clerks to ensure that the voter registration form is modified to include that political party.

(5)  Upon receipt of a voter registration form from an applicant, the county clerk or the clerk's designee shall:

(a)  review each voter registration form for completeness and accuracy; and

(b)  if the county clerk believes, based upon a review of the form, that a person may be seeking to register to vote who is not legally entitled to register to vote, refer the form to the county attorney for investigation and possible prosecution.

